Utah statutes.
11-14-304.   Facsimile signatures and facsimile seal, use permitted --
Validity of signed bonds.
(1)  If the use of a facsimile signature is authorized by the body empowered
by law to authorize the issuance of the bonds or other obligations of any
agency, instrumentality, or institution of this state or of any municipal
corporation, political subdivision, improvement district, taxing district, or
other governmental entity within the state, whether or not issued under this
chapter, any officer so authorized may execute, authenticate, certify, or
endorse, or cause to be executed, authenticated, certified, or endorsed the
bond or other obligation, or any certificate required to be executed on the
back thereof, with a facsimile signature in lieu of his manual signature if at
least one signature required or permitted to be placed on the face thereof
shall be manually subscribed.  Upon compliance with this chapter by the
authorized officer, his facsimile signature has the same legal effect as his
manual signature.  When any seal is required in the execution, authentication,
certification, or endorsement of the bond or other obligation, or any
certificate required to be executed on the back thereof, the authorized
officer may cause the seal to be printed, engraved, lithographed, stamped, or
otherwise placed in facsimile thereon.  The facsimile seal has the same legal
effect as the impression of the seal.
(2)  Bonds or other obligations bearing the signatures (manual or facsimile)
of officers in office on the date of the execution thereof shall be valid and
binding obligations notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof any or
all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have ceased to be
officers of the local political subdivision.
